Maryland, session 2025, HB0852.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–411.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0852*

HOUSE BILL 852
(a) The State Board shall develop and implement a program of drug addiction and
prevention education in the public schools.
(b) (1) Except as provided in subsection (c)(2) of this section, this program shall
be started before the sixth grade in each public school by teachers who are trained in the
field of drug education.
(2) The State Board shall establish standards for determining how a
teacher is considered to be “trained in the field of drug addiction and prevention education”
for the purposes of this section.
(c) (1) The program shall include instruction related to heroin and opioid
addiction and prevention, including information relating to the lethal effect of fentanyl AND
THE MITIGATING EFFECTS OF NALOXONE OR OTHER OPIOID OVERDOSE–REVERSING
MEDICATIONS.
(2) The instruction required under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall
be:
(i) Delivered in grade bands as follows:
1. Third grade through fifth grade;
2. Sixth grade through eighth grade; and
3. Ninth grade through twelfth grade; and
(ii) A stand–alone unit in the program.
(d) This program shall be coordinated with other State agencies that are
responsible for drug abuse education and control.
7–426.5.
(a) Each county board shall establish a policy in accordance with school health
guidelines and State laws and regulations for public schools within its jurisdiction to
authorize [the school nurse, school health services personnel, and other school personnel]
AN INDIVIDUAL ACTING IN GOOD FAITH to administer naloxone or other OPIOID
overdose–reversing medication to a student or other person located on school property who
is reasonably believed to be experiencing an opioid overdose.
(b) The policy established under subsection (a) of this section shall include:
(1) A provision requiring all public schools to obtain and store at the public
school naloxone or other OPIOID overdose–reversing medication to be used in an emergency
situation; [and]

HOUSE BILL 852 3
(2) A requirement that each public school develop and implement a method
for notifying the parents or guardians of students of the school’s policy under this section
at the beginning of each school year; AND
(3) AUTHORIZATION FOR A STUDENT, A MEMBER OF THE SCHOOL’S
STAFF, OR ANY LAWFULLY PRESENT INDIVIDUAL AT THE SCHOOL OR A
SCHOOL–SPONSORED EVENT OR ACTIVITY TO POSSESS NALOXONE OR OTHER
OPIOID OVERDOSE–REVERSING MEDICATION.
(c) Except for any willful or grossly negligent act, any [of the following individuals
who respond] INDIVIDUAL WHO RESPONDS in good faith to the overdose emergency of a
student, A SCHOOL STAFF MEMBER, OR ANY OTHER INDIVIDUAL LAWFULLY PRESENT
AT A SCHOOL in accordance with this section may not be held personally liable for any act
or omission in the course of responding to the emergency[:
(1) A school nurse;
(2) Other school health services personnel who are licensed or certified to
practice a health occupation under the Health Occupations Article; or
(3) Other school personnel].
(d) (1) The county board or the local health department shall, by local
agreement:
(i) Hire a sufficient number of either county or regional community
action officials; or
(ii) Develop and implement a program that provides the community
relations and education functions required to be conducted by community action officials in
paragraph (2) of this subsection.
(2) A county or regional community action official shall:
(i) Coordinate school–based community forums, in cooperation with
local law enforcement officials; and
(ii) Conduct public relations efforts that include the following:
1. Parent contact;
2. Electronic media; and
3. Public service announcements.

HOUSE BILL 852
[(e) (1) For fiscal year 2019, the Governor shall include an appropriation of at
least $3,000,000 in general funds in the State budget for the Department for the purpose
of awarding grants to county boards to implement the policy and conduct the training
required under this section.
(2) The Department shall disburse the grants authorized under paragraph
(1) of this subsection based on the enrollment count of students in public schools in the
State for the prior fiscal year.]
[(f)] (E) (1) On or before October 1 each year, each public school shall submit,
on the form that the Department requires, a report to the Department on each incident at
the school that required the use of naloxone or other OPIOID overdose–reversing
medication.
(2) The Department shall develop and disseminate a standard form to
report each incident requiring the use of naloxone or other OPIOID overdose–reversing
medication at a public school.
[(3) On or before December 1, 2018, December 1, 2019, and December 1,
2020, the Department shall report the information provided under paragraph (1) of this
subsection to the General Assembly in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article.]
11–1201.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, this subtitle applies only
to institutions of higher education in the State that receive operating or capital funding
from the State.
(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, this subtitle does
not apply to:
(i) The University of Maryland Global Campus;
(ii) The University of Maryland Center for Environmental Science;
or
(iii) An off–campus nonresidential location of an institution of higher
education.
(2) Each institution described under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall
provide all students with resources that alert and educate the students regarding heroin
and opioid addiction and prevention.
11–1202.

HOUSE BILL 852 5
(a) Each institution of higher education shall establish a policy that addresses
heroin and opioid addiction and prevention.
(b) [The] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, THE policy
established under this subtitle shall require each institution to:
(1) Require incoming full–time students to participate in an in–person
heroin and opioid addiction and prevention awareness training, unless in–person training
is impracticable, then to participate in an electronic heroin and opioid addiction and
prevention awareness training;
(2) Provide incoming part–time students with resources that alert and
educate the students regarding heroin and opioid addiction and prevention; and
(3) Obtain and store at the institution naloxone or other
overdose–reversing medication to be used in an emergency situation.
(C) ANY TRAINING PROVIDED UNDER THE POLICY ESTABLISHED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL INCLUDE INFORMATION ON THE
MITIGATING EFFECTS OF NALOXONE OR OTHER OPIOID OVERDOSE–REVERSING
MEDICATION.
11–1203.
(a) The policy established under this subtitle shall include:
(1) Training for campus police or other designated personnel on how to
recognize the symptoms of an opioid overdose;
(2) Procedures for the administration of naloxone or other OPIOID
overdose–reversing medications; [and]
(3) The proper follow–up emergency procedures; AND
(4) AUTHORIZATION FOR A STUDENT, A MEMBER OF THE
INSTITUTION’S STAFF, OR ANY LAWFULLY PRESENT INDIVIDUAL AT THE
INSTITUTION TO POSSESS NALOXONE OR OTHER OPIOID OVERDOSE–REVERSING
MEDICATION.
(b) Except for any willful or grossly negligent act, [campus police or other
designated personnel who have been trained under subsection (a)(1) of this section and who
respond] ANY INDIVIDUAL WHO RESPONDS in good faith to the overdose emergency of a
student, A STAFF MEMBER, OR ANY OTHER INDIVIDUAL LAWFULLY PRESENT in
accordance with this section may not be held personally liable for any act or omission in the
course of responding to the emergency.

HOUSE BILL 852
11–1204.
[(a)] On or before October 1 each year, each institution of higher education shall
report to the Commission on each incident at the institution that required the use of
naloxone or other OPIOID overdose–reversing medication.
[(b) On or before December 1, 2018, December 1, 2019, and December 1, 2020, the
Commission shall report the information provided under subsection (a) of this section to
the General Assembly in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article.]
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.